Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1289.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Patient Right-to-Understand Act.Section 2. Legislative intent.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Patients in this Commonwealth frequently receive complex or unclear health care information that prevents informed decision making.(2) Prior authorization rules, coverage limitations, billing practices and appeal procedures are often communicated in legal or technical language.(3) Transforming health care decisions requires patients and purchasers to be able to ask:(i) How much does it cost?12345678910111213141516171819 (ii) Do I need this?(iii) Is this decision being made within the bounds of a doctor-patient relationship only?(4) A system grounded in access, care, time, transparency and trust, known as the Five Pillars of Hope, restores value, efficiency and confidence for patients, businesses and communities.(5) It is the intent of the General Assembly to promote a health care environment in which patients are educated, empowered, engaged and encouraged to participate actively in their health decisions, to understand the health care marketplace and the cost of care and to make choices grounded in trust and transparency within the doctor-patient relationship. A system that supports informed decision making, strengthens communities, improves outcomes and allows individuals and businesses to direct health care dollars toward care that meets their needs.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Health care entity." An insurer, managed care organization, hospital, health system, medical practice or third-party administrator operating in this Commonwealth that submits claims for reimbursement to an insurer or health benefit plan for covered health care services. The term does not include a health care practice that does not submit insurance claims for reimbursement and that is compensated through direct patient or employer payment arrangements, including membership, subscription, bundled or marketplace-facilitated payments.20260SB1289PN1606 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Plain language." Information communicated in everyday terms, using short sentences and examples, free of legal or technical jargon, written at no higher than a sixth-grade reading level.Section 4. Patient right-to-understand requirements.(a) Plain-language summary.--A health care entity shall provide to each patient a plain-language summary of:(1) coverage basics, including deductibles, copayments, coinsurance, facility and professional fees and network restrictions;(2) prior authorization requirements, including timelines and appeal rights;(3) appeal processes for denied services; and(4) expected out-of-pocket costs, based on a good faith estimate, for nonemergent services.(b) Electronic summary.--A health care entity shall provide the summary under subsection (a) electronically upon enrollment or renewal of a health insurance policy and upon patient request.(c) Format and accessibility standards.--A summary required under subsection (a) shall:(1) be concise, prominently displayed and designed to facilitate patient understanding;(2) not exceed two pages in length;(3) use standardized headings and plain-language formatting; and(4) present information in a clear, organized manner that enables patients to readily compare coverage, costs and options.Section 5. Coverage versus care.20260SB1289PN1606 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 A health care entity shall provide a plain-language statement distinguishing between:(1) what is covered by insurance; and(2) what constitutes medical care decisions made solely between a patient and a health care practitioner.Section 6. Patient choice and options disclosure.(a) Disclosure of care and payment options.--A health care entity shall provide information describing legally available care and payment options, including:(1) cash-pay pricing;(2) health savings accounts;(3) employer-funded spending accounts; and(4) out-of-network care options.(b) Endorsement not required.--A health care entity may not require endorsement of any option to receive disclosure under subsection (a).Section 7. Enforcement.A health care entity that fails to provide the required summaries under this act and a certificate of a "Patient's Right to Understand" compliance, as adopted by the Department of Health in accordance with this act, may not engage in debt collection of a patient disputing care that has been provided to the patient or the patient's financial obligations.Section 8. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to:(1) require the adoption of any particular insurance or payment model;(2) limit or restrict access to traditional insurance coverage; or(3) prevent patients, employers or health care 20260SB1289PN1606 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 practitioners from choosing lawful arrangements that best meet their needs within the health care marketplace.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1289PN1606 - 5 - 1234